Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 6. Principal and Income

§§ 2-3-601 through 2-3-614.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 11, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present similar provisions, see article 8 of this chapter.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1963, ch. 189, §§ 1-14, related to the determination, allocation and distribution of principal and income of trusts.